Washington statutes.
RCW 19.285.080

Rule making.

(1) The commission may adopt rules to ensure the proper implementation and enforcement of this chapter as it applies to investor-owned utilities.

(2) The department shall adopt rules concerning only process, timelines, and documentation to ensure the proper implementation of this chapter as it applies to qualifying utilities that are not investor-owned utilities. Those rules include, but are not limited to, rules associated with a qualifying utility's development of conservation targets under RCW 19.285.040(1); a qualifying utility's decision to pursue alternative compliance in RCW 19.285.040(2) (d) or (i) or 19.285.050(1); the format and content of reports required in RCW 19.285.070; and the development of a methodology for calculating baseline levels of generation under RCW 19.285.030(12)(f). Nothing in this subsection may be construed to restrict the rate-making authority of the commission or a qualifying utility as otherwise provided by law.

(3) The commission and department may coordinate in developing rules related to process, timelines, and documentation that are necessary for implementation of this chapter.

(4) Pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, rules needed for the implementation of this chapter must be adopted by December 31, 2007. These rules may be revised as needed to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter.

[ 2017 c 315 s 3; 2007 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 937, approved November 7, 2006).]